District of Columbia statutes.
48-1104

Property subject to forfeiture.

The following shall be subject to forfeiture immediately, and no property right shall exist in them after a final conviction by a court:

(1)

All books, records, and research, including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and data which are used, or intended for use, in violation of this subchapter;

(2)

All money or currency which shall be found in close proximity to drug paraphernalia or which otherwise has been used or intended for use in connection with the manufacture, distribution, delivery, sale, use, dispensing, or possession of drug paraphernalia in violation of § 48-1103; and

(3)

All drug paraphernalia as defined in §§ 48-1101 and 48-1102 and prohibited in § 48-1103.

History

Sept. 17, 1982, D.C. Law 4-149, § 5, 29 DCR 3369

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-604.